nb: Metode for anropsblokkering: Automatisk svarteliste (forhåndslastet database); Ikke-forstyrr-tidsplan; Manuell svarteliste; Robotanropsdeteksjonsalgoritme; Ukjent oppringerscreening; Kun-hviteliste-modus; Annet
hu: Hívásblokkolási módszer: Automatikus tiltólista (előre betöltött adatbázis); Ne zavarjanak ütemezés; Kézi tiltólista; Robotívás-felismerő algoritmus; Ismeretlen hívó szűrése; Csak engedélyezési lista mód; Egyéb
sv: Metod för samtalsspärr: Automatisk blockeringslista (förladdad databas); Stör ej-schema; Manuell blockeringslista; Algoritm för robotsamtalsdetektering; Screening av okända uppringare; Endast vitlistläge; Övrigt
pl: Metoda blokowania połączeń: Automatyczna czarna lista (wstępnie załadowana baza); Harmonogram nie przeszkadzać; Ręczna czarna lista; Algorytm wykrywania automatycznych połączeń; Filtrowanie nieznanych numerów; Tryb tylko białej listy; Inne
ru: Метод блокировки вызовов: Автоматический черный список (предзагруженная база данных); Расписание режима "Не беспокоить"; Ручной черный список; Алгоритм обнаружения роботизированных звонков; Фильтрация неизвестных абонентов; Режим только белого списка; Другой
sl-SI: Metoda blokiranja klicev: Samodejna črna lista (prednaložena baza); Urnik ne moti; Ročna črna lista; Algoritem za zaznavanje robotskih klicev; Pregledovanje neznanih klicateljev; Način samo bela lista; Drugo
lt-LT: Skambučių blokavimo metodas: Automatinis juodasis sąrašas (iš anksto įkeltos duomenų bazė); Netrukdymo grafikas; Rankinis juodasis sąrašas; Roboto skambučių aptikimo algoritmas; Nežinomų skambintojų tikrinimas; Tik baltojo sąrašo režimas; Kita
sk-SK: Metóda blokovania hovorov: Automatická čierna listina (predinštalovaná databáza); Rozvrh režimu nerušiť; Manuálna čierna listina; Algoritmus detekcie robotických hovorov; Filtrovanie neznámych volajúcich; Režim iba biela listina; Iné
ko: 통화 차단 방식: 자동 차단 목록 (사전 로드 데이터베이스); 방해 금지 스케줄; 수동 차단 목록; 로보콜 감지 알고리즘; 모르는 발신자 차단; 허용 목록 전용 모드; 기타
zh-TW: 通話封鎖方式: 自動黑名單（預載資料庫）; 勿擾排程; 手動黑名單; 自動語音電話偵測演算法; 未知來電過濾; 僅白名單模式; 其他
hr-HR: Metoda blokiranja poziva: Automatska crna lista (unaprijed učitana baza podataka); Raspored ne ometaj; Ručna crna lista; Algoritam za otkrivanje automatskih poziva; Filtriranje nepoznatih pozivatelja; Način rada samo bijela lista; Ostalo
it: Metodo di blocco delle chiamate: Lista nera automatica (database precaricato); Programmazione non disturbare; Lista nera manuale; Algoritmo di rilevamento chiamate automatiche; Filtro chiamanti sconosciuti; Modalità solo lista bianca; Altro
ro-RO: Metodă de blocare a apelurilor: Listă neagră automată (bază de date preîncărcată); Program nu deranjați; Listă neagră manuală; Algoritm de detectare apeluri automate; Filtrare apeluri necunoscute; Mod doar listă albă; Altele
en: Call blocking method: Automatic blacklist (preloaded database); Do-not-disturb schedule; Manual blacklist; Robocall detection algorithm; Unknown caller screening; Whitelist-only mode; Other
pt-BR: Método de bloqueio de chamadas: Lista de bloqueio automática (banco de dados pré-carregado); Programação de não perturbe; Lista de bloqueio manual; Algoritmo de detecção de ligações automáticas; Triagem de chamador desconhecido; Modo somente lista permitida; Outro
bg-BG: Метод за блокиране на повиквания: Автоматичен черен списък (предварително заредена база данни); График „Не безпокойте"; Ръчен черен списък; Алгоритъм за разпознаване на роботски обаждания; Филтриране на непознати обаждащи се; Режим само с бял списък; Други
nl: Methode voor oproepblokkering: Automatische zwarte lijst (voorgeladen database); Niet storen schema; Handmatige zwarte lijst; Robocall detectie algoritme; Onbekende beller screening; Alleen witte lijst modus; Andere
ja: 通話ブロック方法: 自動ブラックリスト（プリロードデータベース）; おやすみモードスケジュール; 手動ブラックリスト; ロボコール検出アルゴリズム; 不明な発信者のスクリーニング; ホワイトリストのみモード; その他
fi: Puhelun estotapa: Automaattinen estolistat (esiladattu tietokanta); Älä häiritse -aikataulu; Manuaalinen estolistat; Robopuhelun tunnistusalgoritmi; Tuntemattomien soittajien seulonta; Vain sallittujen lista -tila; Muu
cs: Metoda blokování hovorů: Automatická černá listina (předinstalovaná databáze); Plán nerušit; Manuální černá listina; Algoritmus detekce automatických hovorů; Prověřování neznámých volajících; Režim pouze bílá listina; Jiné
th: วิธีการบล็อกสาย: บัญชีดำอัตโนมัติ (ฐานข้อมูลโหลดไว้ล่วงหน้า); ตารางเวลาห้ามรบกวน; บัญชีดำแบบกำหนดเอง; อัลกอริทึมตรวจจับสายอัตโนมัติ; การคัดกรองผู้โทรไม่ทราบชื่อ; โหมดเฉพาะบัญชีขาว; อื่นๆ
el: Μέθοδος φραγής κλήσεων: Αυτόματη μαύρη λίστα (προφορτωμένη βάση δεδομένων); Πρόγραμμα μη ενόχλησης; Χειροκίνητη μαύρη λίστα; Αλγόριθμος ανίχνευσης αυτόματων κλήσεων; Έλεγχος άγνωστων καλούντων; Λειτουργία μόνο λευκής λίστας; Άλλο
zh-CN: 呼叫拦截方式: 自动黑名单（预加载数据库）; 勿扰时间设置; 手动黑名单; 机器人呼叫检测算法; 未知来电筛选; 仅白名单模式; 其他
tr: Çağrı engelleme yöntemi: Otomatik kara liste (önceden yüklenmiş veritabanı); Rahatsız etmeyin programı; Manuel kara liste; Robot arama algılama algoritması; Bilinmeyen arayan filtreleme; Sadece beyaz liste modu; Diğer
de: Methode zur Anrufblockierung: Automatische Sperrliste (vorgeladene Datenbank); Nicht-stören-Zeitplan; Manuelle Sperrliste; Robocall-Erkennungsalgorithmus; Unbekannte-Anrufer-Filterung; Nur-Positivliste-Modus; Sonstiges
da: Opkaldsblokeringsmetode: Automatisk sortliste (forudindlæst database); Forstyr ikke-tidsplan; Manuel sortliste; Robocall-detekteringsalgoritme; Screening af ukendte opkald; Kun hvidliste-tilstand; Andet
vi: Xác định cách thiết bị nhận diện và chặn các cuộc gọi không mong muốn.: Danh sách chặn tự động (cơ sở dữ liệu tải sẵn); Lịch không làm phiền; Danh sách chặn thủ công; Thuật toán phát hiện cuộc gọi tự động; Sàng lọc người gọi không xác định; Chế độ chỉ danh sách cho phép; Khác
fr: Méthode de blocage d’appels: Liste noire automatique (base de données préchargée); Programmation ne pas déranger; Liste noire manuelle; Algorithme de détection d'appels automatisés; Filtrage des appelants inconnus; Mode liste blanche uniquement; Autre
es: Método de bloqueo de llamadas: Lista negra automática (base de datos precargada); Horario de no molestar; Lista negra manual; Algoritmo de detección de llamadas automáticas; Filtrado de llamadas desconocidas; Modo solo lista blanca; Otros
pt-PT: Método de bloqueio de chamadas: Lista negra automática (base de dados pré-carregada); Horário de não perturbar; Lista negra manual; Algoritmo de deteção de chamadas automáticas; Filtragem de chamador desconhecido; Modo apenas lista branca; Outro